Washington statutes.
RCW 26.04.220

Retention of license by person solemnizing—Auditor's record.

The person solemnizing the marriage is authorized to retain in his or her possession the license, but the county auditor who issues the same, before delivering it, shall enter in his or her marriage record a memorandum of the names of the parties, the consent of the parents or guardian, if any, and the name of the affiant and the substance of the affidavit upon which said license issued, and the date of such license.

[ 2011 c 336 s 687; Code 1881 s 2393; 1866 p 84 s 15; RRS s 8453.]